Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-335
Manufacturer; employee or spouse; restriction on activities.

No manufacturer shall be licensed to conduct any other activity under the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act. No manufacturer shall hold a license to conduct any other kind of gambling activity which is authorized or regulated under Chapter 9 except as provided in sections 9-255.09 and 9-632. No manufacturer or employee or spouse of any manufacturer shall participate in the conduct or operation of any lottery by the sale of pickle cards or any other kind of gambling activity which is authorized or regulated under Chapter 9 except to the exclusive extent of his or her statutory duties as a licensed manufacturer or employee thereof, as a lottery contractor pursuant to the State Lottery Act, and as provided in sections 9-255.09 and 9-632. No manufacturer or employee or spouse of any manufacturer shall have a substantial interest in any other manufacturer, any distributor, any manufacturer-distributor as defined in section 9-616 other than itself, or any licensed organization or any other licensee regulated under Chapter 9.

Laws 1985, LB 408, § 27;

R.S.Supp.,1985, § 9-143.03;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 101;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 37;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 82.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.